src-fst-morphology-phonology.twolc.md
**i2e**
pini+N+Pl+Par: **dog/koira**
* *pi%{nØ%}ni%{front%}%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>%{eõ%}*
* *pinn00000%>e*
kiiĺ+N+Sg+Gen: **tongue/kieli**
* *k%{ei%}%{ei%}{lĺ}%{front%}%^VOWLower%^NoPAL%>%{eõ%}*
* *keel000%>e*
leib+N+Sg+Gen: **bread/leipä**
* *lei{bv}{front}^ÄI2ÄÄ^WGStem>{aä}*
* *leev000>ä*
* *pi%{tdØ%}ä%{front%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%{eõ%}%>t%{aä%}s*
* *pe00000000e%>täs*

**i:ä**
päiv+N+Sg+Gen: **day/päivä**
* *päiv%{front%}%^ÄI2ÄÄ%>ä*
* *pääv00%>ä*

**a2o**
```
* *ka%{nØ%}na%{back%}%^Pen%^StrGStem%^PLPRT*
* *kanno0000*
```

**{ao}o**
```
* *ka%{nØ%}n%{ao%}%{back%}%^G3%^PLPRT*
* *kanno000*
```

### VOWEL LOSS
**a:0**
      a _ (HarmDummiesVar) %>  i  ;  
* *saa%{back%}%>i*
* *sa00%>i*
sõimama+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1
* *sõima%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%>ssi*
* *sõim0000000%>ssi*
* *puhkas%{back%}%^Pen%^VowRM%>a%>ma*
* *puhk0s000%>a%>ma*
võtma+V+Inf/mA: **to take/ottaa**
* *võ{tØ}{tt́}a{back}^Pen^WGStem^Pen^NoPAL^VowRM>m{aä}*
* *võ0t0000000>ma*
võtma+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: **to take/ottaa**
* *võ{tØ}{tt́}a{back}^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^PAL^VowRM*
* *võtt́0000000*

sõda+N+Pl+Par:
* *sõ%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a%{back%}%^Pen%^G3%^VowRM%>o*
* *sõ0t00000%>o*

**ä:0**
pügämä+V+Pss+PrfPrc:
* *pü%{kgØ%}ä%{front%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^VowRM%{eõ%}%>t*
* *pö00000000e%>t*
rehksämä+V+Inf/mA:
* *reh{kØ}ä{sś}{front}^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^VowRM^NoPAL>{aä}>m{aä}*
* *rehkäs000000>ä>mä*

* *jää%{front%}%^VOWRaise%^VowRM%>i*
* *jä0000%>i*
* *elä%{front%}%>et*
* *el00%>et*
tütär+N+Sg+Gen
* *tütä%{rŕ%}%{front%}%^VowRM%>e*
* *tüt0r000%>e*

**U:0 Vx**
```
* *hirnu{back}^Pen^CC2C^VowRM>m{aä}*
* *hirn00000>ma*
* *kut{sś}u{back}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^PAL^VowRM*
* *kutś0000000*
* *tervüs{front}^VowRM^CnsRM>i>t*
* *terv00000>i>t*
juusk+N+Sg+Nom: ____
* *j{ou}{ou}s{kØ}u{back}^VOWRaise^VowRM*
* *ju̬u̬sk0000*

* *kuu{back}^VOWLower^VowRM>i>d*
* *ku0000>i>d*
```

[ Cns: |ArchCns:| Vow: ] _ (s:) (HarmDummiesVar) [(%^Pen: %^CC2C:|%^Pen: %^G3:|%^Pen: %^G4:|PenVOWHite %^Pen: %^G1:) %^VowRM: ]( CnsInZero: (%^Pen: %^CC2C:) %^VowRM: %^CnsRM: )  ; 
* *tüü%{front%}%^VowRM%>hüq*
* *tü000%>hüq*
* *tervüs%{front%}%^VowRM%^WGStem%>i%>t*
* *terv00000%>i%>t*

**e:0**
* *herne%{hØ%}%{front%}%^VowRM%^WGStem%>id%{eõ%}*
* *hern00000%>ide*
läteq+N+Pl?Gen: **spring/lähde**
* *lä{tØ}te{front}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^StrGStem^VowRM>id{eõ}*
* *lätt0000000>ide*

**o:0**
juuma+V+Inf
* *j{ou}{ou}{back}^VOWRaise^VowRM>vv>{aä}q*
* *ju̬0000>vv>aq*

**Vx%{ou%}:0**
juuma+V+Inf
* *j{ou}{ou}{back}^VOWRaise^VowRM>vv>{aä}q*
* *ju̬0000>vv>aq*

**Vx%{äe%}:0 Passive stem vowel**
nõstma+V+Inf/mA
* *nõs{tt́}{aõ}{back}^Pen^NoPAL^VowRM>m{aä}*
* *nõst00000>ma*
kestmä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:
* *kes{tt́}{äe}{front}^Pen^PAL^VowRM*
* *kest́00000*

**ö:0**

**i:0**
hüdsi+N+Sg+Par:
* *hüdsi%{front%}%^TS2S%^VowRM%>t*
* *hü0s0000%>t*
* *aigo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *a00o000*

**õ:0**
* *tapõl{back}^Pen^VowRMõ>m{aä}*
* *tap0l000õ>ma*
* *kan%{dn%}õ%{lĺ%}{back}^StrGStem^Pen^VowRM>õ*
* *kand0l0000>õ*
kogõr+N
* *ko%{kg%}õr{back}^StrGStem^Pen^VowRM>õ*
* *kok0r0000>õ*
hamõq+N+Pl+Ill
* *ha%{mØ%}mõ%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM%>ihe*
* *ha0m0000000%>ihe*

**%{eØ%}: 0**

**%{õØ%}: 0**

VOWEL LENGTHENING

**%{XV%}:u**

**%{XV%}:ü**

**%{XV%}:o**
* *taso%{back%}%-%{XV%}iq*
* *taso0%-oiq*

**%{XV%}:a**

**%{XV%}:ä**

**%{XV%}:õ**
kannõĺ+N+Sg+Gen: **kantele**
* *kan%{dn%}õ%{lĺ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%^NoPAL%>%{XV%}*
* *kand0l0000%>õ*
**%{XV%}:e**
käskmä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Neg **command/käskeä**
* *käs%{kØ%}%{front%}%^WGStem%>%{eõ%}%-%{XV%}iq*
* *käs000%>e%-eiq*

**%{XV%}:i**

**i2j**
* *asi%{back%}%^I2J%>a*
* *asj00%>a*
elläi+N+Sg+Gen
* *e{lØ}lä{ij}{front}^Pen^WGStem^I2J>{aä}*
* *e0läj0000>ä*

**%{ij%}:j**

**%{jiØ%}:j**

**%{jiØ%}:i**
* *ki{rŕ}{jiØ}{front}^NoPAL^JI2I*
* *kiri000*

**%{jiØ%}:0**
vari+N+Sg+Gen: **shadow/varjo**
* *va%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%}o%{back%}%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *vaŕ0o00000*

**%{jØ%}:0**
vari+N+Sg+Gen: **shadow/varjo**
* *va%{rŕ%}%{jiØ%}o%{back%}%^Pen%^PAL%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *vaŕ0o00000*

**u2v** depricate to "%{uv%}:v"

**%{uv%}:v**
* *lu{uv}{dv}{back}^WGStem>{aä}*
* *luvv00>a*
joudma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1
* *jõ%{uv%}%{dd́v%}%{back%}%^WGStem%>i*
* *jõvv00%>i*
* *la{uv}{dv}{back}^WGStem>{aä}*
* *lavv00>a*

**{üv}:v**
* *pü{üv}{dd́v}{front}^WGStem>et*
* *püvv00>et*
* *sü{üv}{dv}{front}^WGStem>ä*
* *süvv00>ä*

*  examples:*

*  examples:*

**%^I7:i**
* *va%^I7o%^StrGStem%>i*
* *vaio0%>0*

**%^I7:i**

CONSONANT
**%{pṕØ%}:ṕ**
* *pap%{pṕØ%}%{back%}%^G2%^PAL*
* *papṕ000*

**%{tt́Ø%}:t́ **
* *täh%{tt́Ø%}%{front%}%^StrGStem%^PAL*
* *täht́000*
* *võ{tØ}{tt́Ø}a{back}^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^PAL^VowRM*
* *võtt́0000000*

**%{tt́Ø%}:t **

täht́+N+Err/Orth-no-pal+Sg+Nom: __star/tähti__
* *täh{tt́Ø}{front}^StrGStem^NoPAL*
* *täht000*
võtma+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3
* *võ{tØ}{tt́Ø}a{back}^Pen^G3^Pen^NoPAL^VowRM>iq*
* *võ0t0000000>iq*
* *hoi{tt́Ø}{back}^VOWRaise^StrGStem^NoPAL>aq*
* *hoit00000>aq*

**%{kḱØ%}:ḱ**

SECONDARY CONSONANT LENGTHENING

**%{pØ%}:p**
```
* *hä%{pØ%}%{pbØ%}ü%{front%}%^Pen%^G4*
* *häppü000*
* *tõ%{pØ%}%{pbv%}%{back%}%^G4%>%{eõ%}*
* *tõpp00%>õ*
* *se%{pØ%}p%{front%}%^StrGStem*
* *sepp00*
* *nu%{pØ%}pu%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM*
* *nupp0000000*
```

**{tØ}:t**
* *sõ%{tØ%}da%{back%}%^G4%^PLPRT*
* *sõtto000*
* *si%{tØ%}t%{front%}%^StrGStem*
* *sitt00*
* *ü%{tØ%}te%{front%}%^Pen%^StrGStem*
* *ütte000*
* *mü%{tØ%}tü%{front%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM*
* *mütt0000000*
sõda+N+Sg+Ill:
* *sõ%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a%{back%}%^Pen%^G3*
* *sõtta000*
* *uh{tØ}a{sś}{back}^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^VowRM^NoPAL>{aä}>m{aä}*
* *uht0s000000>a>ma*
* *unõh{tØ}u{back}^Pen^StrGStem*
* *unõhtu000*

**%{t́Ø%}:t́**

**%{Øk%}:k**
igä+N+Sg+Ill
* *i{kØ}{kgØ}ä{front}^Pen^G4*
* *ikkä00*
* *mä%{Øk%}%{kgØ%}%{front%}%^G4%>%{eõ%}*
* *mäkk00%>e*

**%{XC%}:s**

**%{XC%}:l**

**%{XC%}:ĺ**

**%{XC%}:k**

**%{cć%}:ć**

**%{cć%}:c**

### Consonant weakening 

**kToZero**  
* *puhkas%{back%}%^WGStem%>taq*
* *puh0as00%>taq*

* *ikkõ%{back%}%^Pen%^CC2C%^VowRM%>m%{aä%}*
* *ik000000%>ma*

**%{pṕØ%}:0**  

**%{tt́Ø%}:0**  
* *võ{tØ}{tt́Ø}a^Pen^G1^Pen^NoPAL^VowRM>eti*
* *võ00000000>eti*

**%{kḱØ%}:0**  

* *j{ou}{ou}s{kḱØ}{back}^VOWLower^WGStem>{eõ}*
* *joos0000>õ*
* ★*j{ou}{ou}s{kḱØ}{back}^VOWLower^WGStem>{eõ}* (is not standard language)
* ★*joosk000>õ* (is not standard language)

**%{sØ%}:0**  

* *su%{sØ%}śo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *su0śo000*
vaśma+V+Inf/mA: **answer/vastata**
* *va{sØ}{sś}{back}^VOWRaise^WGStem^PAL>m{aä}*
* *va0ś0000>ma*
* *ham%{bm%}a%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^WGStem*
* *hamba0000000*

* *rahva{sØ}{back}^VowRM^WGStem>id{eõ}*
* *rahv00000>idõ*

**%{vØ%}:0**  
kruv́ma+V+Inf/mA
* *kru{vØ}{vv́}{back}^VOWRaise^WGStem^PAL>m{aä}*
* *kru0v́0000>ma*

**%{rØ%}:0**  
* *a%{rØ%}ro%{back%}%^Pen%^G2*
* *a0ro000*

**%{nØ%}:0**  
* *su%{nØ%}ńo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *su0ńo000*
* *va{nØ}{nń}u{back}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^CC2C^Pen^NoPAL^VowRM>m{aä}*
* *va0n000000000>m{aä}*

**%{lØ%}:0**  
* *ta%{lØ%}lo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *ta0lo000*

**%{mØ%}:0**  
* *su%{sØ%}śo%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *su0śo000*

**%{kØ%}:0**  
* *puh%{kØ%}as%{back%}%^WGStem%>taq*
* *puh0as00%>taq*
* *vis%{kØ%}a%{back%}%^WGStem%>aq*
* *vis0a00%>aq*

nätsk+A+Sg+Gen
* *nä%{td%}s%{kØ%}%{front%}%^G1%>%{aä%}*
* *näds000%>ä*

* *eläni{kØ}{kg}{front}^G3*
* *eläni0k00*
* *i%{kØ%}kõ%{back%}%^Pen%^CC2C%^VowRM%>m%{aä%}*
* *i0k00000%>ma*

kakma:
* *ka%{kØ%}%{kḱ%}u%{back%}%^Pen%^CC2C%^VowRM%>m%{aä%}*
* *ka0k00000%>ma*

kõiḱ+Pron+Sg+Nom
* *kõi%{kØ%}%{kḱg%}%{back%}%^CC2C%^PAL*
* *kõi0ḱ000*
* *ri%{kØ%}ka%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *ri0kas00000*
jõgi+N+Sg+Gen: **river/joki**
* *jõ%{kØ%}%{kgØ%}%{back%}%^G1%>%{eõ%}*
* *jõ0000%>õ*

**pToZero**
* *tapp%{back%}%^CC2C%>m%{aä%}*
* *tap000%>ma*

**%{pØ%}:0**
* *se%{pØ%}p%{front%}%^WGStem*
* *se0p00*

* *tap%{pØ%}%{back%}%^CC2C%>m%{aä%}*
* *tap000%>ma*

**XØToZero**
agras+A+Sg+Gen
* *a%{kg%}ra%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^G2%^WGStem*
* *akra0000000*
* *ve%{rØ%}rev%{front%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>%{aä%}*
* *ve0rev000%>ä*
elläi+N+Sg+Gen
* *e{lØ}lä{ij}{front}^Pen^WGStem^I2J>{aä}*
* *e0läj0000>ä*
pereh+N+Sg+Gen: **family/perhe**
* *pe{rØ}re{hØ}{front}^Pen^StrGStem^WGStem*
* *perre00000*
hamõh+N+Sg+Nom
* *ha%{mØ%}mõ%{hØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^StrGStem*
* *ha0mõh000000*

**XØToSelf**
villui+A+Sg+Nom
* *vi{lØ}lui{back}^Pen^G3*
* *villui000*

kevväi+N+Sg+Gen: **spring**
* *ke%{vØ%}vä%{ij%}%{front%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>ä*
* *ke0väj000%>ä*

**%{sØ%}:s**
ratas+N+Sg+Nom
* *ra%{tØ%}ta%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^StrGStem*
* *ra0tas000000*
kaardas+N+Sg+Nom
* *kaar%{dØ%}a%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^StrGStem*
* *kaardas000000*
agras+A+Sg+Nom
* *a%{kg%}ra%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^StrGStem*
* *agras000000*

**%{hØ%}:h**
hamõh+N+Sg+Nom
* *ha%{mØ%}mõ%{hØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^StrGStem*
* *ha0mõh000000*

**%{kØ%}:k**
rehksämä+V+Inf/mA:
* *reh{kØ}ä{sś}{front}^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^VowRM^NoPAL>{aä}>m{aä}*
* *rehk0s000000>ä>mä*
* *as%{kØ%}o%{back%}%^Pen%^G2*
* *asko000*
* *eläni{kØ}{kg}{back}^G4>{eõ}*
* *elänikk00>e*
makḱ+N+Pl+All
* *ma{kØ}{kḱ}{back}^StrGStem^NoPAL>{eõ}>l{eõ}*
* *makk000>õ>lõ*
egä+Det+Sg+Ill:
* *e{kØ}{kg}ä{front}^Pen^G4*
* *ekkä000*
igä+N+Sg+Ill: **age/ikä**
* *i{kØ}{kgØ}ä{front}^Pen^G4*
* *ikkä000*

**%{pb%}:p**
* *kau%{pb%}%{õØ%}%{lĺ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^Pen%^VowRM%>%{eõ%}%>m%{aä%}*
* *kaup0l0000000%>õ%>ma*

* *li%{pb%}õ%{back%}%^Pen%^G2*
* *lipõ000*

**%{t́d́%}:d́**

**%{t́d́%}:t́**

**%{td%}:t**
* *lu̬u̬dusõkai{td}sõ^Pen^VOWLower^Pen^WGStem>q*
* *lu̬u̬dusõkaitsõ0000>q*
võitlõma+V+Inf/mA
* *või{td}{õØ}{lĺ}{back}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^VowRM^NoPAL>{eõ}>m{aä}*
* *võit0l00000000>õ>ma*
nätsk+A+Sg+Nom
* *nä%{td%}s%{kØ%}%{front%}%^G2*
* *nätsk00*
hõrts+N+Sg+Nom
* *hõr%{td%}so%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem%^VowRM*
* *hõrts0000000*

**%{kg%}:k**
akaŕ+A+Sg+Nom
* *a%{kg%}a%{rŕ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^G2%^PAL*
* *akaŕ0000*
* *rän%{kg%}%{front%}%^G3*
* *ränk00*

* *avali{kØ}{kg}{back}^G3*
* *avali0k00*
egä+Det+Sg+Nom:
* *e{kØ}{kg}ä{front}^Pen^G2*
* *e0gä000*

**%{kg%}:g**
apteḱ+N+Sg+Gen:
* *apte{kØ}{kḱg}{back}^VOWLower^G2>i*
* *apte0g000%>i*
agras+A+Sg+Nom:
* *a%{kg%}ra%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *agras00000*
egä+Det+Sg+Nom:
* *e{kØ}{kg}ä{front}^Pen^G2*
* *e0gä000*

* *hõl%{kg%}a%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^G2*
* *hõlgas000*
* *rän%{kg%}%{front%}%^G2%{aä%}*
* *räng00ä*

nõkõś+N+Sg+Ill
* *nõ%{kg%}õ%{sś%}%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%{XC%}%>õ%>he*
* *nõgõs000s%>õ%>he*

* *a%{kg%}ra%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *agras000*

**%{td%}:d**

kaotama+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:
* *kao%{td%}a%{back%}%^Pen%^G2*
* *kaoda000*

**%{tt́d%}:d**
kergütämä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:
* *kergü{tt́d}{front}^VOWRaise^WGStem^NoPAL>{aä}*
* *kergüd0000>ä*

**tToZero**
hüdsi+N+Sg+Par:
* *hüdsi%{front%}%^TS2S%^VowRM%>t*
* *hü0s0000%>t*

* *att%{back%}%^CC2C%>m%{aä%}*
* *at000%>ma*

**%{tØ%}:0**
* *puh%{tØ%}a%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem*
* *puh0as000*
ratas+N+Sg+Nom
* *ra%{tØ%}ta%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%^StrGStem*
* *ra0tas00000*

sõda+N+Sg+Gen:
* *sõ%{tØ%}%{tdØ%}a%{back%}%^Pen%^G1*
* *sõ00a000*

**%{t́Ø%}:0**

### CONSONANT QUALITY CHANGE

**%{pṕb%}:b**
* *loro%{pṕb%}%{back%}%^G2%>i*
* *lorob00%>i*

**%{pb%}:b**
habras+A+Sg+Nom
* *ha%{pb%}ra%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%^StrGStem*
* *habras0000*

* *ki%{pb%}õ%{nń%}%{back%}%^Pen%^WGStem%>%{aä%}*
* *kibõn000%>a*

**p2b**

**b20**

**%{pbØ%}:b**

**%{dr%}:r**
murrõq+N+Sg+Nom
* *mur%{dr%}õ%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^WGStem%>q*
* *murrõ00000%>q*

**%{dr%}:d**
murrõq+N+Sg+Gen
* *mur%{dr%}õ%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWRaise%^Pen%^StrGStem*
* *murdõ00000*

**%{ḱǵj%}:ǵ**

**%{ḱǵj%}:ḱ**

**%{ḱǵj%}:0**

**%{tdØ%}:d**

**%{dØ%}:d**
väärdlemä+V+Inf/mA
* *väär{dØ}{eØ}{lĺ}{front}^Pen^VOWRaise^Pen^StrGStem^Pen^VowRM^NoPAL>{eõ}>m{aä}*
* *väärd0l00000000>e>mä*

kaardas+N+Sg+Nom
* *kaar%{dØ%}a%{sØ%}%{back%}%^Pen%^VOWLower%^Pen%^StrGStem%^StrGStem*
* *kaardas000000*
